Hawaii statutes.
[§435H-5] Officers and employees of
the Hawaii health connector. (a) The board shall appoint officers and
employ staff, including an executive director who shall be responsible for the
day-to-day operations and management of the exchange, according to a staffing
plan that shall be submitted to the legislature. Officers and employees of the
board shall not be employees of the State and shall serve at the pleasure of
the board.

(b) The board may hire consultants, outside
experts, and professional specialists as needed for its efficient operations.
[L 2011, c 205, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next